Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 3 STATE AND LOCAL LICENSING
44-3-311. Public notice - posting and publication - definition.

Upon receipt of an application, except an application for renewal or for transfer of ownership, the local licensing authority shall schedule a public hearing upon the application not less than thirty days from the date of the application and shall post and publish the public notice thereof not less than ten days prior to the hearing. Public notice shall be given by the posting of a sign in a conspicuous place on the premises for which application has been made and by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the premises are located.

Notice given by posting shall include a sign of suitable material, not less than twenty-two inches wide and twenty-six inches high, composed of letters not less than one inch in height and stating the type of license applied for, the date of the application, the date of the hearing, and the name and address of the applicant, and such other information as may be required to fully apprise the public of the nature of the application. If the applicant is a partnership, the sign shall contain the names and addresses of all partners, and if the applicant is a corporation, association, or other organization, the sign shall contain the names and addresses of the president, vice president, secretary, and manager or other managing officers.

Notice given by publication shall contain the same information as that required for signs.

If the building in which the alcohol beverage is to be sold is in existence at the time of the application, any sign posted as required in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be placed so as to be conspicuous and plainly visible to the general public. If the building is not constructed at the time of the application, the applicant shall post the premises upon which the building is to be constructed in such a manner that the notice shall be conspicuous and plainly visible to the general public.

At the public hearing held pursuant to this section, any party in interest shall be allowed to present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses.

As used in this subsection (5), "party in interest" means any of the following:

The applicant;

An adult resident of the neighborhood under consideration;

The owner or manager of a business located in the neighborhood under consideration;

The principal or representative of any school located within five hundred feet of the premises for which the issuance of a license pursuant to section 44-3-309 (1) is under consideration.

The local licensing authority, in its discretion, may limit the presentation of evidence and cross-examination so as to prevent repetitive and cumulative evidence or examination.

Nothing in this subsection (5) shall be construed to prevent a representative of an organized neighborhood group that encompasses part or all of the neighborhood under consideration from presenting evidence subject to this section. The representative shall reside within the neighborhood group's geographic boundaries and shall be a member of the neighborhood group. The representative shall not be entitled to cross-examine witnesses or seek judicial review of the licensing authority's decision.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 985, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-311 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-312. Results of investigation - decision of authorities.

Not less than five days prior to the date of hearing, the local licensing authority shall make known its findings based on its investigation in writing to the applicant and other interested parties. The local licensing authority has authority to refuse to issue any licenses provided in sections 44-3-309 (1) and 44-4-107 for good cause, subject to judicial review.

Before entering any decision approving or denying the application, the local licensing authority shall consider, except where this article 3 specifically provides otherwise, the facts and evidence adduced as a result of its investigation, as well as any other facts, the reasonable requirements of the neighborhood for the type of license for which application has been made, the desires of the adult inhabitants, the number, type, and availability of alcohol beverage outlets located in or near the neighborhood under consideration, and any other pertinent matters affecting the qualifications of the applicant for the conduct of the type of business proposed; except that the reasonable requirements of the neighborhood shall not be considered in the issuance of a club liquor license. For the merger and conversion of retail liquor store licenses to a single liquor-licensed drugstore license in accordance with section 44-3-410 (1)(b), the local licensing authority shall consider the reasonable requirements of the neighborhood and the desires of the adult inhabitants of the neighborhood.

Any petitioning otherwise required to establish the reasonable requirements of the neighborhood shall be waived for a bed and breakfast permit applicant unless the local licensing authority has previously taken affirmative, official action to rescind the availability of such waiver in all subsequent cases.

Any decision of a local licensing authority approving or denying an application shall be in writing stating the reasons therefor within thirty days after the date of the public hearing, and a copy of the decision shall be sent by certified mail to the applicant at the address shown in the application.

No license shall be issued by any local licensing authority after approval of an application until the building in which the business is to be conducted is ready for occupancy with such furniture, fixtures, and equipment in place as is necessary to comply with the applicable provisions of this article 3 and article 4 of this title 44, and then only after inspection of the premises has been made by the licensing authority to determine that the applicant has complied with the architect's drawing and the plot plan and detailed sketch for the interior of the building submitted with the application.

After approval of any application, the local licensing authority shall notify the state licensing authority of the approval, who shall investigate and either approve or disapprove such application.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 986, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-312 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-313. Restrictions for applications for new license.

An application for the issuance of any license specified in section 44-3-309 (1) or 44-4-107 (1) shall not be received or acted upon:

If the application for a license described in section 44-3-309 (1) concerns a particular location that is the same as or within five hundred feet of a location for which, within the two years next preceding the date of the application, the state or a local licensing authority denied an application for the same class of license for the reason that the reasonable requirements of the neighborhood and the desires of the adult inhabitants were satisfied by the existing outlets.

Subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section shall not apply to cities in which limited gaming is permitted pursuant to section 9 of article XVIII of the state constitution.

No licensing authority shall consider an application for any license to sell fermented malt beverages at retail pursuant to section 44-4-107 (1) if, within one year before the date of the application, the state or a local licensing authority has denied an application at the same location for the reason that the reasonable requirements of the neighborhood or the desires of the inhabitants were satisfied by the existing outlets.

Until it is established that the applicant is, or will be, entitled to possession of the premises for which application is made under a lease, rental agreement, or other arrangement for possession of the premises, or by virtue of ownership thereof;

For a location in an area where the sale of alcohol beverages as contemplated is not permitted under the applicable zoning laws of the municipality, city and county, or county;

If the building in which the alcohol beverages are to be sold pursuant to a license described in section 44-3-309 (1) is located within five hundred feet of any public or parochial school or the principal campus of any college, university, or seminary; except that this subsection (1)(d)(I) does not:

Affect the renewal or reissuance of a license once granted;

Apply to licensed premises located or to be located on land owned by a municipality;

Apply to an existing licensed premises on land owned by the state;

Apply to a liquor license in effect and actively doing business before the principal campus was constructed;

Apply to any club located within the principal campus of any college, university, or seminary that limits its membership to the faculty or staff of the institution; or

Apply to a campus liquor complex.

The distances referred to in subsection (1)(d)(I) of this section are to be computed by direct measurement from the nearest property line of the land used for school purposes to the nearest portion of the building in which liquor is to be sold, using a route of direct pedestrian access.

The local licensing authority of any city and county, by rule or regulation; the governing body of any other municipality, by ordinance; and the governing body of any other county, by resolution, may eliminate or reduce the distance restrictions imposed by this subsection (1)(d) for any class of license, or may eliminate one or more types of schools or campuses from the application of any distance restriction established by or pursuant to this subsection (1)(d).

In addition to the requirements of section 44-3-312 (2), the local licensing authority shall consider the evidence and make a specific finding of fact as to whether the building in which the liquor is to be sold is located within any distance restrictions established by or pursuant to this section. This finding shall be subject to judicial review pursuant to section 44-3-802.

If the building in which the fermented malt beverages are to be sold pursuant to a license under section 44-4-107 (1)(a) is located within five hundred feet of any public or parochial school or the principal campus of any college, university, or seminary; except that this subsection (1)(e)(I) does not apply to:

Licensed premises located or to be located on land owned by a municipality;

An existing licensed premises on land owned by the state;

A fermented malt beverage retailer that held a valid license and was actively doing business before the principal campus was constructed;

A club located within the principal campus of any college, university, or seminary that limits its membership to the faculty or staff of the institution; or

A campus liquor complex.

The distances referred to in subsection (1)(e)(I) of this section are to be computed by direct measurement from the nearest property line of the land used for school purposes to the nearest portion of the building in which fermented malt beverages are to be sold, using a route of direct pedestrian access.

The local licensing authority of any city and county, by rule or regulation; the governing body of any other municipality, by ordinance; or the governing body of any other county, by resolution, may:

Eliminate or modify the distance restrictions imposed by this subsection (1)(e); or

Eliminate one or more types of schools or campuses from the application of any distance restriction established by or pursuant to this subsection (1)(e).

In addition to the requirements of section 44-3-312 (2), the local licensing authority shall consider the evidence and make a specific finding of fact as to whether the building in which the fermented malt beverages are to be sold is located within any distance restriction established by or pursuant to this subsection (1)(e). The finding is subject to judicial review pursuant to section 44-3-802.

This subsection (1)(e) applies to:

Applications for new fermented malt beverage retailer's licenses under section 44-4-107 (1)(a) submitted on or after June 4, 2018; and

Applications submitted on or after June 4, 2018, under section 44-3-301 (9) by fermented malt beverage retailers licensed under section 44-4-107 (1)(a) to change the permanent location of the fermented malt beverage retailer's licensed premises.

An application for the issuance of a tavern or retail liquor store license may be denied under this article 3 if the local licensing authority or the state on state-owned property determines, pursuant to section 44-3-301 (2)(b), that the issuance of the license would result in or add to an undue concentration of the same class of license and, as a result, require the use of additional law enforcement resources.

Source:

L. 2018:

IP(1) amended and (1)(e) added, (SB 18-243), ch. 366, p. 2200, § 7, effective June 4; entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 987, § 2, effective October 1.